Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 1 Primacy and Reclamation Act of Tennessee [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]
59-8-118. Civil action for relief — Action to enforce order. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Notwithstanding § 20-4-101(a) to the contrary, the commissioner may request the attorney general and reporter to institute a civil action for relief against any operator, permittee, or person or the operator's, permittee's, or person's agent, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order, and venue and jurisdiction for the action shall be in the Davidson County chancery or circuit court or the chancery or circuit court in the district where the surface mining operation is located, whenever the operator, permittee, person, or agent:

Violates or fails or refuses to comply with any cease and desist order issued by the commissioner under this part;

Interferes with, hinders, or delays the commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this part;

Refuses to admit the commissioner to a surface coal mining and reclamation operation;

Refuses to permit inspection of a coal mine by the commissioner;

Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the commissioner in furtherance of this part;

Refuses to permit access to, and copying of, records that the commissioner determines to be necessary in carrying out this part; or

Violates or threatens to violate this part, the board's rules, or a permit issued under this part, or violates or threatens to violate any cease and desist order or determination issued pursuant to this part.

A court that is presiding over a civil action initiated under subdivision (a)(1) shall provide the relief that is appropriate.

The commissioner may bring an action to enforce a cease and desist order issued under this part if an appeal of the order is not requested in a timely manner and the order has not been complied with. In an action to enforce a cease and desist order, all findings of fact contained in the order and complaint are deemed to be final and not subject to review except as to receipt of notice of the order; provided, the defendant may proffer evidence of compliance with the cease and desist order.

The commissioner may also bring an action to enforce any order made by the commissioner, which has become final either by the failure of any person to appeal the commissioner's order or by an appellate court's decision against any person who fails to comply with a final order. In these suits, the commissioner's decision shall not be subject to challenge as to matters of fact; provided, the defendant may present evidence showing compliance with the commissioner's order.

Notwithstanding § 20-4-101(a) to the contrary, any action for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other relief brought by the commissioner shall be filed in, and venue and jurisdiction for the action shall be in, the Davidson County chancery or circuit court, or the chancery or circuit court in the district where the surface mining operation is located, in which all or a part of the violation is or is about to occur, in the name of the department by the district attorney general or by the attorney general and reporter at the direction of the commissioner or the board, and under the supervision of the attorney general and reporter.

An enforcement proceeding shall not be tried by a jury.

Appeals from judgments or decrees issued by trial courts in proceedings brought under this part shall be made to the supreme court despite the fact that controverted questions of fact may be involved.

Nothing in this part eliminates any additional enforcement rights or procedures that are available under any state law to the commissioner, but are not specifically enumerated in this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-119. Civil action by aggrieved person — Intervention by commissioner. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), any aggrieved person may commence a civil action in the Davidson County chancery court or the chancery court in the district where the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located to compel compliance with this part:

Against the state or any state or local governmental agency, to the extent permitted by the eleventh amendment to the United States constitution, which is alleged to be in violation of this part, or any rule promulgated under this part, or order or permit issued pursuant to this part, or against any other person who is alleged to be in violation of this part, or any rule promulgated under this part, or order or permit issued pursuant to this part; or

Against the commissioner to the extent permitted by the eleventh amendment to the United States constitution, when the commissioner is alleged to have failed to perform any role or duty under this part that is not discretionary for the commissioner.

No action may be commenced under subdivision (a)(1):

Until sixty (60) days after the plaintiff has provided written notice of the violation to the secretary, the commissioner, and any alleged violator; or

If the commissioner, the board, or the state has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a civil action to require compliance with this part, or any rule promulgated under this part, or order or permit issued pursuant to this part, but in any such action any person may intervene as a matter of right.

No action may be commenced under subdivision (a)(2) until sixty (60) days after the plaintiff has provided written notice of the violation to the commissioner, in the manner that the board requires by rules promulgated under § 59-8-103(b)(1), except that an action may be brought immediately after notice of the violation is provided to the commissioner, if the violation or order complained of constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff.

The commissioner may intervene in any civil action brought under this section as a matter of right.

The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought under subsection (a), may award costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees and expert witness fees, to any party, whenever the court determines the award is appropriate. The court may, if a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, require the filing of a bond or equivalent security in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section restricts any right that any person, or class of persons, may have under any statute or common law to seek enforcement of this part and the rules issued pursuant to it, or to seek any other relief, including relief against the commissioner.

Any person who incurs a personal injury or property damage due to an operator's violation of any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this part may bring an action for damages against the operator, including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, in the Davidson County chancery court or the chancery court of the county in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation complained of is located. Nothing in this subsection (g) affects the rights established by, or limits imposed under, the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-120. Hearings. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Any hearing brought before the board pursuant to §§ 59-8-112, 59-8-113, 59-8-114, 59-8-115, 59-8-116, 59-8-117, and 59-8-125 shall be conducted as a contested case.

The hearing shall be heard before an administrative judge sitting alone pursuant to §§ 4-5-301(a)(2) and 4-5-314(b), unless settled by the parties.

The administrative judge to whom the case has been assigned shall convene the parties for a scheduling conference within thirty (30) days of the date the petition is filed.

The scheduling order for the contested case issued by the administrative judge shall establish a schedule that results in a hearing being completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the scheduling conference, unless the parties agree to a longer time or the administrative judge allows otherwise for good cause shown, and an initial order being issued within sixty (60) days of completion of the record of the hearing.

The administrative judge's initial order, together with any earlier orders issued by the administrative judge, shall become final, unless appealed to the board by the commissioner or other party within thirty (30) days of entry of the initial order or, unless the board passes a motion to review the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-315, within the longer of thirty (30) days or seven (7) days after the first board meeting to occur after the entry of the initial order. Upon appeal to the board by a party, or upon passage of a motion of the board to review the administrative judge's initial order, the board shall afford each party an opportunity to present briefs, shall review the record, and shall allow each party an opportunity to present oral arguments.

If appealed to the board or reviewed by the board, the review of the administrative judge's initial order shall be limited to the record, but shall be de novo with no presumption of correctness.

In an appeal or review as provided in subdivisions (a)(5) and (6), the board shall render a final order, in accordance with § 4-5-314, affirming, modifying, remanding, or vacating the administrative judge's order.

A final order rendered pursuant to this section is effective upon its entry, except as provided in § 4-5-320(b), unless a later effective date is stated in the final order.

A petition to stay the effective date of a final order may be filed under § 4-5-316.

A petition for reconsideration of a final order may be filed pursuant to § 4-5-317.

Judicial review of a final order may be sought by filing a petition for review in accordance with § 4-5-322.

An order of an administrative judge that becomes final in the absence of an appeal or review by the board shall be deemed to be a decision of the board in that case for purposes of the standard of review by a court; provided, in other matters before the board, it may be considered but shall not be binding on the board.

Notwithstanding § 20-4-101(a) to the contrary, in the case of or refusal to comply with a notice of hearing, subpoena, or order issued under this section, venue and jurisdiction for the action shall be in the Davidson County chancery court or the chancery court in the district where the surface mining operation is located, upon application of the board or the commissioner, to issue an order requiring such person to appear and testify or produce evidence as the case may require, and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any operator, permittee, or person to whom an order of suspension of a permit or order to cease and desist surface coal mining and reclamation operations is directed pursuant to this part, shall comply with the order immediately, but, on appeal to the board, shall, within thirty (30) days, have a hearing and decision on the order, unless temporary relief has been granted by the commissioner or by a court.

Any aggrieved person may, after filing an appeal to the board, file with the board a written request that the commissioner grant temporary relief from any complaint or order, together with a detailed statement giving reasons for requesting the relief. The board shall issue an order or decision granting or denying the relief within five (5) days of its receipt, unless the parties agree to a longer time. The board may grant the relief requested, under the conditions the board prescribes, if:

All parties to the proceeding have been notified and a hearing has been held in the locality of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations on the request for temporary relief in which all parties were given an opportunity to be heard;

The operator, permittee, or person shows that there is a substantial likelihood that the final decision of the board in the hearing will be favorable to the operator, permittee, or person; and

The relief will not adversely affect the health or safety of the public or cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Whenever an order or decision is issued, either by the board or as a result of any administrative proceeding under this part, at the request of any person, a sum equal to the aggregate amount of the expenses for the hearing and administrative judge as determined by the board to have been reasonably incurred by the person for, or in connection with, the person's participation in the proceedings, including any judicial reviews of agency action, may be assessed against either party as the court, resulting from judicial review, or the board, deems proper.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-121. Judicial review — Temporary relief. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Notwithstanding § 20-4-101(a) to the contrary, any final order or determination by the board is subject to judicial review, and venue and jurisdiction for such action shall be in the Davidson County chancery court or the chancery court in the district where the surface mining operation is located.

Judicial review shall be pursuant to § 4-5-322; however, no judicial review shall be had of any order that becomes final as a result of failure of the aggrieved party to appear at a hearing:

That was requested by the aggrieved party; and

For which the aggrieved party received adequate notice.

In the case of a proceeding to review any order or decision issued by the board under this part, including an order or decision pertaining to any order for cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, the court may, under such conditions as it may prescribe, grant any temporary relief that it deems appropriate pending a final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that that person will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

The relief requested will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-122. Enforcement or protection of interest in water resources affected by mining operation — Repair or compensation for subsidence damage — Replacement of water supply. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Nothing in this part affects the right of any person to enforce or protect, under applicable law, that person's interest in water resources affected by a mining operation.

The permittee or operator of a surface coal mine shall replace the water supply of an owner of an interest in real property who obtains all or part of that owner's supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other legitimate use from an underground or surface source when the water supply has been affected by contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting from the surface coal mine operation.

Underground coal mining operations conducted in this state after October 24, 1992, shall:

Promptly repair, or compensate for, material damage resulting from subsidence caused to any occupied residential dwelling and structures related thereto, or noncommercial building due to underground coal mining operations. Repair of damage shall include rehabilitation, restoration, or replacement of the damaged occupied residential dwelling and structures related thereto, or noncommercial building. Compensation shall be provided to the owner of the damaged occupied residential dwelling and structures related thereto, or noncommercial building and shall be in the full amount of the diminution in value resulting from the subsidence. Compensation may be accomplished by the purchase, prior to mining, of a noncancellable premium-prepaid insurance policy; and

Promptly replace any drinking, domestic, or residential water supply from a well or spring in existence prior to the application for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit, which has been affected by contamination, diminution, or interruption resulting from underground coal mining operations.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall interrupt underground coal mining operations.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-123. Departure from environmental protection performance standards on experimental basis. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

In order to encourage advances in coal surface mining and reclamation practices, or to allow post-mining land use for industrial, commercial, residential, or public use, including recreational facilities, the commissioner, with the approval of the secretary, may authorize departures in individual cases on an experimental basis from the environmental protection performance standards promulgated under this part.

The departures may be authorized if:

The experimental practices are potentially more environmentally protective, or at least as protective, during and after mining operations, as those required by promulgated standards;

The mining operations approved for a particular land use or other purposes are not larger or more numerous than necessary to determine the effectiveness and economic feasibility of the experimental practices;

The experimental practices do not reduce the protection afforded public health and safety below that provided by promulgated standards; and

All other state and federal agencies with jurisdiction over the environmental standards or practices for which departure is desired concur with the departure.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-124. Declaration of hazard — Authority of commissioner to fill or reclaim. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

The general assembly declares that voids, and open and abandoned tunnels, shafts, auger holes, and entryways resulting from any previous mining operation, constitute a hazard to the public health or safety, and that surface impacts of any underground or surface coal mining and reclamation operation may degrade the environment. The commissioner is authorized to fill voids, seal abandoned tunnels, shafts, auger holes, and entryways, and reclaim surface impacts of underground or surface coal mines that the commissioner determines could endanger life and property, constitute a hazard to public health and safety, or degrade the environment. The commissioner is authorized to carry out this subsection (a) as part of this state's approved abandoned mine reclamation program, as provided for in § 59-8-301.

Funds available for use in carrying out the purpose of this section may include those funds which are allocated to this state under 30 U.S.C. § 1232(g).

In those instances where mine piles are being reworked for environment and conservation purposes, the incremental costs of disposing of the wastes from the operations by using them to fill voids and seal tunnels may be eligible for funding pursuant to this section; provided, that the disposal of these wastes meets the purposes of this section.

The commissioner may acquire by purchase, donation, or otherwise the interest in land that the commissioner determines necessary to carry out this section.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-125. Designation of land area as unsuitable for surface coal mining and reclamation operations. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

The commissioner shall establish a planning process enabling objective decisions to be made based upon competent and scientifically sound data and information as to which, if any, land areas of this state are unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining and reclamation operations pursuant to the standards set forth in this part, but that designation shall not prevent the mineral exploration of any designated area.

Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to subsection (b), the commissioner shall designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining and reclamation operations if the commissioner determines that reclamation pursuant to the requirements of this part is not technologically and economically feasible.

Upon petition pursuant to subsection (b), an area may be designated unsuitable for certain types of surface coal mining and reclamation operations if such operations:

Are incompatible with existing state or local land use plans or programs;

Affect fragile or historic lands in a way that could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific, and esthetic values and natural systems;

Affect renewable resource lands, including, but not limited to, aquifers and aquifer recharge areas, in a way that could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or of food or fiber products; or

Affect natural hazard lands, including, but not limited to, areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology, in a way that could substantially endanger life and property.

The program shall include a process that includes:

A database and inventory system that will permit proper evaluation of the capacity of different land areas of this state to support and permit reclamation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations;

A method or methods for implementing land use planning decisions concerning surface coal mining and reclamation operations; and

Proper notice and opportunities for public participation, including a public hearing prior to making any designation or redesignation, pursuant to this section.

Determinations of the unsuitability of land for surface coal mining and reclamation operations shall be integrated as closely as possible with present and future land-use planning and regulation processes at the federal, state, and local levels.

This section does not apply to lands on which surface coal mining operations are being conducted on August 3, 1977, or under a permit issued pursuant to this part, or where substantial legal and financial commitments in the operation were in existence prior to January 4, 1977.

Any aggrieved person may petition the commissioner to have an area designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining and reclamation operations, or to have an existing designation terminated. A petition filed pursuant to this subsection (b) shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence that tends to establish the allegations. Within ten (10) months after receipt of the petition, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing in the locality of the affected area, after appropriate notice and publication of the date, time, and location of such hearing. After a petition has been filed, but before the hearing on it, any person may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence that would tend to establish the allegations. Within sixty (60) days after the hearing, the commissioner shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party to the hearing, a written decision regarding the petition, and the reasons for the decision. In the event that all of the petitioners stipulate agreement prior to the requested hearing, and withdraw their requests, the hearing need not be held.

Prior to designating any land areas as unsuitable for surface coal mining and reclamation operations, the commissioner shall prepare a detailed statement on:

The potential coal resources of the area;

The demand for coal resources; and

The impact of the designation on the environment, the economy, and the supply of coal.

In reaching a decision on whether to designate any land areas as unsuitable for surface coal mining and reclamation operations, the commissioner shall use:

The information contained in the database, records, and inventory system;

Any information that was provided by other governmental agencies or the public; and

The information contained in the detailed statement provided in subsection (c).

The commissioner shall issue a final written decision, including a statement of findings, within sixty (60) days of the completion of the public hearing, or if no public hearing is held, within twelve (12) months of receipt of the complete petition. The commissioner shall simultaneously notify the petitioner, other parties to the hearing, and the regional director of the office of surface mining, of the decision by certified mail.

The commissioner's decision is subject to appeal to the board as provided in § 59-8-120, and to judicial review as provided in § 59-8-121.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-126. Promulgation of rules requiring training, examination, and certification of persons engaging in, or directly responsible for, blasting or use of explosives. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

The board shall promulgate rules under §59-8-103(b)(1) to require the training, examination, and certification of persons engaging in, or directly responsible for, blasting or use of explosives in coal surface mining operations.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]